Florida, session 2026, SB1632.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 115 116 Section 1.âSection 2.05, Florida Statutes, is created to 117 read: 118 2.05âApplication of religious or foreign law.â 119 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 120 (a)ââForeign lawâ means a legal code or formal system of 121 law of a foreign country or nation, or of an international 122 organization. 123 (b)ââReligious lawâ means a legal code or formal system of 124 law that is associated with a religion and is based on the 125 sacred texts or traditions of such religion. The term includes 126 Sharia law. 127 (2)âNotwithstanding subsection (1), the terms âforeign lawâ 128 and âreligious lawâ do not include the following: 129 (a)âThe natural law or natural rights, as such law or 130 rights are understood within the legal tradition of the United 131 States or this state. 132 (b)âA provision of the United States Constitution or a 133 constitution of one of the several states. 134 (c)âA provision of federal or state law. 135 (d)âThe common law, including the common law as described 136 in s. 2.01. 137 (e)âA provision of law of a Native American tribe within a 138 state or territory of the United States. 139 (3)âA court, administrative law judge, hearing officer, 140 agency, arbitration panel, or any other authority or tribunal 141 established by law or agreement of the parties may not enforce a 142 provision of religious law or foreign law between any person and 143 the state or its agencies, political subdivisions, or 144 municipalities, unless the enforcement of such provision is 145 required by federal or state law. However, in no event may such 146 provision be enforced against a person if such enforcement would 147 violate a constitutional right of such person under the United 148 States Constitution or the Florida Constitution. 149 (4)âA court, administrative law judge, hearing officer, 150 agency, arbitration panel, or any other authority or tribunal 151 established by law or agreement of the parties may not enforce 152 any provision of religious law or foreign law in any matter or 153 case between private persons, notwithstanding any contractual 154 agreement between them, if the enforcement of such provision 155 would violate the rights of any person under federal or state 156 law. However, such provision may be enforced if such enforcement 157 is required by the United States Constitution or the Florida 158 Constitution. 159 (5)âThis section does not apply to the governance, 160 administration, or adjudication of ecclesiastical matters of a 161 religious organization, including, but not limited to: 162 (a)âThe selection, appointment, discipline, or removal of 163 employees or clergy. 164 (b)âThe interpretation of doctrine. 165 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 617.1420, Florida 166 Statutes, is amended to read: 167 617.1420âGrounds for administrative dissolution.â 168 (1)âThe Department of State may commence a proceeding under 169 s. 617.1421 to administratively dissolve a corporation if: 170 (a)âThe corporation has failed to file its annual report 171 and pay the annual report filing fee by 5 p.m. Eastern Time on 172 the third Friday in September; 173 (b)âThe corporation is without a registered agent or 174 registered office in this state for 30 days or more; 175 (c)âThe corporation does not notify the Department of State 176 within 30 days after its registered agent or registered office 177 has been changed, after its registered agent has resigned, or 178 after its registered office has been discontinued; 179 (d)âThe corporation has failed to answer truthfully and 180 fully, within the time prescribed by this act, interrogatories 181 propounded by the Department of State; or 182 (e)âThe corporationâs period of duration stated in its 183 articles of incorporation has expired; or 184 (f)âThe corporation has been designated as a domestic 185 terrorist organization or foreign terrorist organization 186 pursuant to s. 943.03102, such designation has been published in 187 the Florida Administrative Register, and any timely judicial 188 challenge under that section has been resolved against the 189 organization. 190 Section 3.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 775.30, 191 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 192 775.30âTerrorism; defined; penalties.â 193 (1)âAs used in this chapter and the Florida Criminal Code, 194 the term: 195 (a)âterms âTerrorismâ or âterrorist activityâ means mean an 196 activity that: 197 1.(a)âInvolves: 198 a.1.âA violent act or an act dangerous to human life which 199 is a violation of the criminal laws of this state or of the 200 United States; or 201 b.2.âA violation of s. 815.06; and 202 2.(b)âIs intended to: 203 a.1.âIntimidate, injure, or coerce a civilian population; 204 b.2.âInfluence the policy of a government by intimidation 205 or coercion; or 206 c.3.âAffect the conduct of government through destruction 207 of property, assassination, murder, kidnapping, or aircraft 208 piracy. 209 (b)ââDomestic terrorist organizationâ means an organization 210 whose designation as such has been published in the Florida 211 Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102. 212 (3)âA person who violates commits a violation of subsection 213 (2) which results in death or serious bodily injury commits a 214 life felony, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 215 or s. 775.084. As used in this subsection, the term âserious 216 bodily injuryâ means an injury to a person which creates a 217 substantial risk of death, serious personal disfigurement, or 218 protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member 219 or an organ. 220 Section 4.âParagraphs (c), (d), and (e) of subsection (1) 221 of section 775.32, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 222 paragraphs (d), (e), and (f), respectively, subsections (2), 223 (3), and (4) are amended, and a new paragraph (c) is added to 224 subsection (1) of that section, to read: 225 775.32âUse of military-type training provided by a 226 designated foreign terrorist organizations organization.â 227 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 228 (c)ââDomestic terrorist organizationâ means an organization 229 whose designation as such has been published in the Florida 230 Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102. 231 (2)âA person who has received military-type training from a 232 designated foreign terrorist organization or a domestic 233 terrorist organization may not use, attempt to use, or conspire 234 to use such military-type training with the intent to unlawfully 235 harm another person or damage a critical infrastructure 236 facility. 237 (3)âA person who violates commits a violation of subsection 238 (2) commits a felony of the second degree, punishable as 239 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 240 (4)âA person who violates commits a violation of subsection 241 (2) which results in the death of, or serious bodily injury to, 242 a person commits a felony of the first degree, punishable as 243 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 244 Section 5.âParagraphs (b) through (e) of subsection (1) of 245 section 775.33, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as paragraphs 246 (c) through (f), respectively, subsections (3) and (5) are 247 amended, and a new paragraph (b) is added to subsection (1) of 248 that section, to read: 249 775.33âProviding material support or resources for 250 terrorism or to terrorist organizations.â 251 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 252 (b)ââDomestic terrorist organizationâ means an organization 253 whose designation as such has been published in the Florida 254 Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102. 255 (3)âA person who knowingly provides material support or 256 resources to a designated foreign terrorist organization or a 257 domestic terrorist organization, or attempts or conspires to do 258 so, commits a felony of the first degree, punishable as provided 259 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. To violate this 260 subsection, a person must have knowledge that the organization 261 is a designated foreign terrorist organization or a domestic 262 terrorist organization, or that the organization has engaged in 263 or engages in terrorism or terrorist activity. 264 (5)(a)âFor purposes of prosecution under subsection (2) or 265 subsection (3), a person is deemed to provide material support 266 or resources by providing personnel if the person knowingly 267 provides, attempts to provide, or conspires to provide himself 268 or herself or another person to: 269 1.âWork under the direction and control of a designated 270 foreign terrorist organization or a domestic terrorist 271 organization, or a person engaged in, or intending to engage in, 272 an act of terrorism; or 273 2.âOrganize, manage, supervise, or otherwise direct the 274 operations of a designated foreign terrorist organization or a 275 domestic terrorist organization, or a person engaged in, or 276 intending to engage in, an act of terrorism. 277 (b)âAn individual who acts entirely independently of the 278 designated foreign terrorist organization or a domestic 279 terrorist organization, or the person engaged in, or intending 280 to engage in, an act of terrorism to advance the organizationâs 281 or personâs goals or objectives is not working under the 282 direction and control of the designated foreign terrorist 283 organization or domestic terrorist organization or person 284 engaged in, or intending to engage in, an act of terrorism. 285 Section 6.âSection 775.34, Florida Statutes, is amended to 286 read: 287 775.34âMembership in a designated foreign terrorist 288 organizations organization.â 289 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 290 (a)ââDesignated foreign terrorist organizationâ has the 291 same meaning as provided in s. 775.32. 292 (b)ââDomestic terrorist organizationâ means an organization 293 whose designation as such has been published in the Florida 294 Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102. 295 (2)âA person who willfully becomes a member of a designated 296 foreign terrorist organization or a domestic terrorist 297 organization and serves under the direction or control of that 298 organization with the intent to further the illegal acts of the 299 organization commits a felony of the second degree, punishable 300 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. As used in 301 this section, the term âdesignated foreign terrorist 302 organizationâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 775.32. 303 Section 7.âSubsection (7) of section 874.03, Florida 304 Statutes, is amended to read: 305 874.03âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 306 (7)ââTerrorist organizationâ means any organized group 307 engaged in or organized for the purpose of engaging in terrorism 308 as defined in s. 775.30. The term includes: 309 (a)âA domestic terrorist organization whose designation as 310 such has been published in the Florida Administrative Register 311 in accordance with s. 943.03102. 312 (b)âA foreign terrorist organization whose designation as 313 such has been published in the Florida Administrative Register 314 in accordance with s. 943.03102. 315 316 This definition does not shall not be construed to prevent 317 prosecution under this chapter of individuals acting alone. 318 Section 8.âSection 943.03102, Florida Statutes, is created 319 to read: 320 943.03102âDesignation of terrorist organizations.â 321 (1)(a)âIn order to ensure the safety of this state, and the 322 safety of the residents of this state, the Chief of Domestic 323 Security may designate an organization: 324 1.âA domestic terrorist organization if the Chief of 325 Domestic Security finds that the organization meets the 326 following criteria: 327 a.âThe organization is based or operates in this state or 328 the United States. 329 b.âThe organization is engaging in terrorist activity as 330 defined in s. 775.30. 331 c.âThe terrorist activity of the organization is an ongoing 332 threat to the security of this state or the United States. 333 2.âA foreign terrorist organization if the Chief of 334 Domestic Security finds that the organization meets the 335 following criteria: 336 a.âThe organization is designated as a foreign terrorist 337 organization by the United States Secretary of State pursuant to 338 s. 219 of the Immigration and Nationality Act. 339 b.âThe terrorist activity of the organization is an ongoing 340 threat to the security of this state or the United States. 341 (b)âThe Chief of Domestic Security must maintain a list of 342 organizations that he or she designates as domestic terrorist 343 organizations or foreign terrorist organizations. 344 (c)âAt least once every 5 years, the Chief of Domestic 345 Security must review each designation made under paragraph (a) 346 which labels an organization a domestic terrorist organization 347 or a foreign terrorist organization. 348 (2)(a)âAt least 7 days before making a designation under 349 subsection (1), the Chief of Domestic Security must provide 350 written notice to the Governor and Cabinet of his or her intent 351 to designate an organization as a domestic terrorist 352 organization or a foreign terrorist organization, which notice 353 must be accompanied by written findings regarding the basis for 354 such designation. 355 (b)âUpon receipt of written notice made pursuant to 356 paragraph (a), the Governor and Cabinet may, by a majority vote, 357 approve or reject a designation made by the Chief of Domestic 358 Security under subsection (1). 359 (c)âWithin 7 days after approval by the Governor and 360 Cabinet of a designation made by the Chief of Domestic Security 361 under subsection (1), the Chief of Domestic Security must 362 publish notice of the designation in the Florida Administrative 363 Register. 364 (d)âWithin 30 days after publication of a notice of the 365 designation in the Florida Administrative Register, the 366 organization designated as a domestic terrorist organization or 367 a foreign terrorist organization, or any member of such 368 organization, may challenge such designation in the circuit 369 court of the Second Judicial Circuit in and for Leon County. 370 (3)(a)âAn organization designated as a domestic terrorist 371 organization or a foreign terrorist organization may petition 372 the department, at any time, for the removal of such 373 designation. 374 (b)âAt any time, the Governor and Cabinet may remove, by a 375 majority vote, a designation made by the Chief of Domestic 376 Security under subsection (1). 377 (4)âA state agency, political subdivision, or public school 378 district authorized to expend state-appropriated funds or levy 379 ad valorem taxes may not: 380 (a)âExpend such funds or taxes to support a foreign 381 terrorist organization or a domestic terrorist organization, or 382 a member of such organization, whose designation as such has 383 been published in the Florida Administrative Register in 384 accordance with this section. 385 (b)âAccept any funds from a foreign terrorist organization 386 or a domestic terrorist organization, or a member of such 387 organization, whose designation as such has been published in 388 the Florida Administrative Register in accordance with this 389 section. 390 (5)âThe department shall adopt rules to implement this 391 section. 392 Section 9.âParagraph (t) is added to subsection (1) of 393 section 1002.421, Florida Statutes, to read: 394 1002.421âState school choice scholarship program 395 accountability and oversight.â 396 (1)âPRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.âA private 397 school participating in an educational scholarship program 398 established pursuant to this chapter must be a private school as 399 defined in s. 1002.01 in this state, be registered, and be in 400 compliance with all requirements of this section in addition to 401 private school requirements outlined in s. 1002.42, specific 402 requirements identified within respective scholarship program 403 laws, and other provisions of Florida law that apply to private 404 schools, and must: 405 (t)âProhibit: 406 1.âEmployment of or contracting with; 407 2.âOwnership or operation by; and 408 3.âAcceptance of funds from 409 410 a person or entity that is affiliated with or in any way 411 controlled by: 412 a.âA foreign terrorist organization whose designation as 413 such has been published in the Florida Administrative Register 414 in accordance with s. 943.03102, or a member of such 415 organization; 416 b.âA criminal gang or a criminal gang member as defined in 417 s. 874.03; 418 c.âA terrorist organization as defined in s. 874.03; 419 d.âA transnational crime organization, as defined in s. 420 874.03, or a member of such organization; 421 e.âA domestic terrorist organization as defined in s. 422 775.32; 423 f.âA person or entity that has: 424 (I)âProvided material support or resources, as defined in 425 s. 775.33(1), to; or 426 (II)âReceived such support or resources from 427 428 a foreign terrorist organization whose designation as such has 429 been published in the Florida Administrative Register in 430 accordance with s. 943.03102, or a criminal gang, terrorist 431 organization, transnational crime organization, or domestic 432 terrorist organization, as those terms are defined in s. 874.03; 433 g.âA person or entity that has demonstrated a pattern or 434 practice of supporting or advocating for terrorism as defined in 435 s. 775.30(1); 436 h.âA school program or student group that promotes a 437 domestic terrorist organization or a foreign terrorist 438 organization whose designation as such has been published in the 439 Florida Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102; 440 or 441 i.âA school program or student group that promotes a person 442 or entity providing material support, as defined in s. 775.33, 443 to a domestic terrorist organization or a foreign terrorist 444 organization whose designation as such has been published in the 445 Florida Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102. 446 447 The department shall suspend the payment of funds to a private 448 school that knowingly fails to comply with this subsection, and 449 shall prohibit the school from enrolling new scholarship 450 students, for 1 fiscal year and until the school complies. If a 451 private school fails to meet the requirements of this subsection 452 or has consecutive years of material exceptions listed in the 453 report required under paragraph (q), the commissioner may 454 determine that the private school is ineligible to participate 455 in a scholarship program. 456 Section 10.âSection 1003.035, Florida Statutes, is created 457 to read: 458 1003.035âProhibited expenditures.âA public school, 459 including a charter school, school district, charter school 460 administrator, or direct-support organization for any such 461 school or school district, may not expend any state or federal 462 funds to promote, support, or maintain any programs or campus 463 activities that: 464 (1)âPromote a domestic terrorist organization or a foreign 465 terrorist organization whose designation as such has been 466 published in the Florida Administrative Register in accordance 467 with s. 943.03102. 468 (2)âPromote a person or entity providing material support, 469 as defined in s. 775.33, to a domestic terrorist organization or 470 a foreign terrorist organization whose designation as such has 471 been published in the Florida Administrative Register in 472 accordance with s. 943.03102. 473 Section 11.âSubsection (2) of section 1004.06, Florida 474 Statutes, is amended to read: 475 1004.06âProhibited expenditures.â 476 (2)(a)âA Florida College System institution, state 477 university, Florida College System institution direct-support 478 organization, or state university direct-support organization 479 may not expend any state or federal funds to promote, support, 480 or maintain any programs or campus activities that: 481 1.(a)âViolate s. 1000.05; or 482 2.(b)âAdvocate for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or 483 promote or engage in political or social activism, as defined by 484 rules of the State Board of Education and regulations of the 485 Board of Governors; or 486 3.âPromote a domestic terrorist organization or a foreign 487 terrorist organization whose designation as such has been 488 published in the Florida Administrative Register in accordance 489 with s. 943.03102. 490 (b)âThe State Board of Education or the Board of Governors, 491 as applicable, may withhold performance-based funding of a 492 Florida College System institution or state university that 493 violates subparagraph (a)3. 494 (c)âStudent fees to support student-led organizations are 495 allowed permitted notwithstanding any speech or expressive 496 activity by such organizations which would otherwise violate 497 this subsection, provided that the public funds must be 498 allocated to student-led organizations pursuant to written 499 policies or regulations of each Florida College System 500 institution or state university, as applicable. Use of 501 institution facilities by student-led organizations is allowed 502 permitted notwithstanding any speech or expressive activity by 503 such organizations which would otherwise violate this 504 subsection, provided that such use must be granted to student 505 led organizations pursuant to written policies or regulations of 506 each Florida College System institution or state university, as 507 applicable. 508 Section 12.âSubsection (3) is added to section 1006.61, 509 Florida Statutes, to read: 510 1006.61âParticipation by students in disruptive activities, 511 and promotion of foreign terrorist organizations, at public 512 postsecondary educational institution; penalties.â 513 (3)(a)âPursuant to 8 C.F.R. s. 214.3(g)(2), a public 514 postsecondary educational institution must report information 515 relating to the current status of a student who is attending the 516 institution on a student visa if the student promotes a foreign 517 terrorist organization or a domestic terrorist organization 518 whose designation as such has been published in the Florida 519 Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102. 520 (b)âAfter a student of a state institution of higher 521 learning has been determined to have promoted a foreign 522 terrorist organization or a domestic terrorist organization 523 whose designation as such has been published in the Florida 524 Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102, such 525 student shall be immediately expelled from the institution. 526 Section 13.âSection 1009.01, Florida Statutes, is amended 527 to read: 528 1009.01âDefinitions.âThe term: 529 (1)ââDomestic terrorist organizationâ means an organization 530 whose designation as such has been published in the Florida 531 Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102. 532 (2)ââForeign terrorist organizationâ means an organization 533 whose designation as such has been published in the Florida 534 Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102. 535 (3)ââOut-of-state feeâ means the additional fee for 536 instruction charged by a public postsecondary educational 537 institution in this state, which fee is charged to a student who 538 does not qualify for the in-state tuition rate pursuant to s. 539 1009.21. A charge for any other purpose may not be included in 540 this fee. 541 (4)(1)ââTuitionâ means the basic fee charged to a student 542 for instruction provided by a public postsecondary educational 543 institution in this state. A charge for any other purpose may 544 shall not be included in within this fee. 545 (2)ââOut-of-state feeâ means the additional fee for 546 instruction provided by a public postsecondary educational 547 institution in this state, which fee is charged to a student who 548 does not qualify for the in-state tuition rate pursuant to s. 549 1009.21. A charge for any other purpose shall not be included 550 within this fee. 551 (5)(3)ââTuition differentialâ means the supplemental fee 552 charged to a student by a public university in this state 553 pursuant to s. 1009.24(16). 554 Section 14.âSubsection (22) of section 1009.23, Florida 555 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (23), and a new subsection 556 (22) is added to that section, to read: 557 1009.23âFlorida College System institution student fees.â 558 (22)âA student who has been determined to have promoted a 559 domestic terrorist organization or a foreign terrorist 560 organization whose designation as such has been published in the 561 Florida Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102, 562 during any term of enrollment, shall be immediately expelled 563 from the institution and assessed the out-of-state fee 564 established in subsection (3). 565 Section 15.âSubsection (22) is added to section 1009.24, 566 Florida Statutes, to read: 567 1009.24âState university student fees.â 568 (22)âA student who has been determined to have promoted a 569 domestic terrorist organization or a foreign terrorist 570 organization whose designation as such has been published in the 571 Florida Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102, 572 during any term of enrollment, shall be immediately expelled 573 from the institution and assessed the out-of-state fee 574 established in subsection (4). 575 Section 16.âSubsection (22) is added to section 1009.26, 576 Florida Statutes, to read: 577 1009.26âFee waivers.â 578 (22)âA student who promotes a domestic terrorist 579 organization or a foreign terrorist organization whose 580 designation as such has been published in the Florida 581 Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102, during 582 any term of enrollment, is ineligible for any fee waiver under 583 this section. 584 Section 17.âSection 1009.8963, Florida Statutes, is created 585 to read: 586 1009.8963âProhibition on awarding of scholarships, grants, 587 and other aid.âA student who promotes a domestic terrorist 588 organization or a foreign terrorist organization whose 589 designation as such has been published in the Florida 590 Administrative Register in accordance with s. 943.03102, during 591 any term of enrollment, may not be awarded any institutional or 592 state grants, financial aid, scholarships, or tuition assistance 593 under this chapter. 594 Section 18.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.